Massachusetts, session 194th, H3305.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the Generals Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 15ZZZZZZ
the following section:-
Section 15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
June 7 as Tourette Syndrome Awareness Day and recommending that the day be observed in an
appropriate manner by the people.
of 1